Wisconsin, session 2025, AB162.
do enact as follows:AB162,1Section 1. 106.11 (title) of the statutes is amended to read:106.11 (title) Workforce investment programs; metrics.AB162,2Section 2. 106.11 of the statutes is renumbered 106.11 (1) (a) and amended to read:106.11 (1) (a) The department shall cooperate with the federal government in carrying out the purposes of the federal Workforce Investment Act of 1998, 29 USC 2801 to 2945 Innovation and Opportunity Act of 2014, 29 USC 3101 to 3361. In administering the programs authorized by that act, the department shall, in cooperation with other state agencies and with local workforce development boards established under 29 USC 2832 3122, establish a statewide workforce investment system to meet the employment, training, and educational needs of persons in this state.(b) If a local workforce development board anticipates that there may be a business closing or mass layoff under s. 109.07 in the area served by that board, the board may prepare a list of resources available in that area that provide career planning, job search, job skills training, and other support services for affected employees, as defined in s. 109.07 (1) (a), including contact information for those resources, for distribution to those employees under s. 109.07 (1m) (a).AB162,3Section 3. 106.11 (1) (title) and (2) of the statutes are created to read:106.11 (1) (title) Workforce investment.(2) Workforce development metrics. (a) In this subsection:1. “Workforce development program or activity” means any program or coordinated activities funded in whole or in part by the state, whether by using state or federal funds, that does any of the following within this state:a. Promotes or provides job training or work readiness services.b. Assists individuals with looking for wage-earning work in this state.c. Assists with or otherwise facilitates job placement within the state.2. “Workforce development program or activity” includes all of the following, in addition to what is specified under subd. 1.:a. The Transform Milwaukee Jobs program and Transitional Jobs programs under s. 49.163.b. The department of corrections’ initiatives to reintegrate offenders into the community.c. The employment and training program administered by the department of children and families under s. 49.79 (9).d. The Wisconsin Works program administered by the department of children and families under ss. 49.141 to 49.161.e. Any workforce development program or activity funded, whether directly or indirectly, by the federal American Rescue Plan Act of 2021, P.L. 117-2.(b) 1. Any state agency or authority that operates, coordinates, or oversees a workforce development program or activity shall, subject to subd. 3., track and report on the performance of the workforce development program or activity, using all of the following primary indicators of performance:a. The percentage of program or activity participants who are in unsubsidized employment during the 2nd quarter after exit from the program or activity.b. The percentage of program or activity participants who are in unsubsidized employment during the 4th quarter after exit from the program or activity.c. The median earnings of program participants who are in unsubsidized employment during the 2nd quarter after exit from the program.d. The percentage of program or activity participants who obtain a recognized postsecondary credential, or a secondary school diploma or its recognized equivalent, during participation in or within one year after exit from the program or activity. For purposes of this subd. 1. d., program or activity participants who obtain a secondary school diploma or its recognized equivalent shall be included in the percentage counted as meeting the criterion only if such participants, in addition to obtaining such diploma or its recognized equivalent, have obtained or retained employment or are in an education or training program leading to a recognized postsecondary credential within one year after exit from the program or activity.e. The percentage of program participants who, during a program year, are in an education or training program that leads to a recognized postsecondary credential or employment and who are achieving measurable skill gains toward such a credential or employment.f. The percentage of participants in unsubsidized employment during the 2nd quarter after exit from the program or activity who were employed by the same employer in the 2nd and 4th quarters after exit.2. Any state agency or authority that is required to perform the tracking and reporting under subd. 1. shall publish the data through a single, state-maintained website.3. A state agency is not required to do any of the following under subds. 1. and 2.:a. Report data on minors.b. Report on the performance of a workforce development program or activity to the extent that such reporting would violate confidentiality requirements under federal law.4. The agency shall make or update the report required under subd. 1. at least annually and shall submit reports to the appropriate standing committees of the legislature under s. 13.172 (3).(c) The department shall assist state agencies to comply with par. (b).AB162,4Section 4. 109.07 (1m) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:109.07 (1m) (a) Subject to sub. (5) or (6), an employer that has decided upon a business closing or mass layoff in this state shall promptly notify the subunit of the department that administers s. 106.15, any affected employee, any collective bargaining representative of any affected employee, and the highest official of any municipality in which the affected employment site is located, in writing of such action no later than 60 days prior to the date on which the business closing or mass layoff takes place. The notice to an affected employee shall also include contact information for the local workforce development board under 29 USC 2832 serving the area in which the employment site is located and, if available, the list of resources prepared under s. 106.11 (1) (b). The employer shall provide in writing all information concerning its payroll, affected employees, and the wages and other remuneration owed to those employees as the department may require. The department may in addition require the employer to submit a plan setting forth the manner in which final payment in full shall be made to affected employees. Down Down /2025/related/vetoedinfull/ab162 true vetoedenrolledbills /2025/related/vetoedinfull/ab162 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/AB162 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/AB162 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Vetoed in Full»AB162: Text as Enrolled × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting